New York, session 2025-2026, A9602.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 29-f to read as follows: 3 § 29-f. Voluntary veterans' registry. 1. The department shall estab- 4 lish a voluntary veterans' registry for the purpose of providing infor- 5 mation on federal, state, and local governmental benefits, programs, and 6 services available to veterans, and to link veterans with resources that 7 can provide assistance. 8 2. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 9 the following meanings: 10 (a) "State agency" means any department, board, bureau, division, 11 commission, council, or committee within the executive branch, the state 12 university of New York, the city university of New York, or any public 13 authority under control of the executive branch of the state of New 14 York. 15 (b) "Voluntary veterans' registry" or "registry" means the voluntary 16 veterans' registry established pursuant to subdivision one of this 17 section. 18 (c) "State veterans' service agency" means a state veterans' service 19 agency established pursuant to section thirteen of this article. 20 (d) "Local veterans' service agency" means a local veterans' service 21 agency established pursuant to section fourteen of this article. 22 3. Upon a veteran's registration with the registry, if permission is 23 granted by such veteran, such veteran's information shall be shared with 24 other state agencies, state veterans' service agencies, and local veter- 25 ans' service agencies. 26 4. The department shall coordinate with other state agencies that have 27 contact with veterans to establish a paper and online voluntary veter- 28 ans' registry form to enable state agencies to assist the department in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14495-01-6 A. 9602 2 1 registering veterans who wish to be included in the registry. The 2 department shall provide access to such paper and online voluntary 3 veterans' registry form which shall contain a statement indicating the 4 purpose of the registry and that filling out such form does not guaran- 5 tee that a veteran is eligible for any benefits. Such form shall include 6 but not be limited to the following information: 7 (a) name; 8 (b) address; 9 (c) gender; 10 (d) branch of military service; 11 (e) dates of military service; 12 (f) contact information, including phone or email; 13 (g) a signed statement, or for the online version, a box that is 14 checked, indicating that the veteran grants permission to the department 15 to store and share such veteran's information with the local veterans' 16 service agencies' directors and with the other state agencies to ensure 17 that the state provides such veteran assistance in receiving earned 18 benefits; and 19 (h) any other information that the department may request. 20 5. Each state agency shall: 21 (a) utilize the paper or online voluntary veterans' registry form to 22 develop a mechanism to identify veterans the agency serves for the 23 purpose of expanding the registry; 24 (b) for each veteran who wishes to be included in the voluntary veter- 25 ans' registry, the agency shall provide assistance in filling out the 26 paper or online registry form for the department to add each such veter- 27 an to the registry; and 28 (c) submit a veteran's paper registry form to the department within 29 sixty days from the date the veteran opts in to the voluntary veterans' 30 registry. 31 6. Information collected under this section shall not be sold or used 32 for commercial purposes or used for purposes not specified under this 33 section. Information regarding a veteran's status shall be protected as 34 personal confidential material and shall only be used to assist in 35 providing information about benefits and entitlements for veterans 36 residing in the state on the federal, state, and local government level. 37 Data collected under this section may be used by the department to 38 assist in formulating future policy initiatives and shared with the 39 veterans' services commission pursuant to section three of this article 40 in its role of assisting the commissioner in the formulation of policies 41 affecting veterans. 42 7. On or before December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, and 43 annually thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the 44 governor, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary president of 45 the senate. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the total 46 number of voluntary veterans' registry forms that were completed for the 47 calendar year and a breakdown of registered veterans by gender and 48 location. 49 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 3 of the veterans' services law is 50 amended to read as follows: 51 5. The commission shall have power, and it shall be its duty, to 52 assist the state commissioner in the formulation of policies affecting 53 veterans, including using data collected pursuant to section twenty- 54 nine-f of this article, and in the coordination of all operations of 55 state agencies relating to veterans' services. A. 9602 3 1 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 2 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 3 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 4 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 5 effective date.